Washington statutes.
RCW 19.158.080

Duties of director.

The director of the department of licensing may make rules, create forms, and issue orders as necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter, pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW.

[ 1989 c 20 s 8.]